Wisconsin, session 2025, AB125.
do enact as follows:AB125,13Section 1. 118.02 (3m) of the statutes is created to read:AB125,1,44118.02 (3m) February 18, Vel R. Phillips’s birthday.AB125,25Section 2. Initial applicability.AB125,2,21(1) This act first applies to the school year beginning after the effective date of 2this subsection.AB125,2,33